Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201890-549
Transfer to Property Tax Credit Cash Fund.

The State Treasurer shall transfer $202,000,000 from the General Fund to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund on or before December 15, 2016, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 2015, LB661, § 8.